Hawaii statutes.
§291-52.5
Issuance of identification card. The issuing agency shall issue one
identification card at the same time it issues a removable windshield placard,
temporary removable windshield placard, or special license plates to a person
with a disability. [L 2001, c 297, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 30, §5; am L 2010, c
141, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next